District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.30

Repealed

Diminution of capital stock when debts exceed proposed capital.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1288, ch. 854, § 634
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.30.
1981 Ed., § 29-230.
1973 Ed., § 29-230.